Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.38.040

Examinations of any branch of an out-of-state state bank—Reporting requirements for any branch of an out-of-state bank—Supervisory agreements—Joint examinations or enforcement actions—Assessments.

(1) The director may make examinations of any branch in this state of an out-of-state state bank as the director deems necessary to determine whether the branch is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state or is conducting its activities in accordance with safe and sound banking practices. The provisions applicable to examinations and sharing of information of Washington state banks shall apply to these examinations.

(2) The director may prescribe requirements for reports regarding any branches of an out-of-state bank that operates a branch in Washington pursuant to this chapter. The required reports shall be provided by the bank or by the bank supervisory agency having primary responsibility for the bank. Any reporting requirements prescribed by the director under this subsection shall be consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to Washington state banks and appropriate for the purpose of enabling the director to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter.

(3) The director may enter into supervisory agreements with any bank supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a Washington state bank or an out-of-state state bank operating a branch in this state pursuant to this chapter to engage the services of that agency's examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the director's examiners to that agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. These contracts are exempt from the requirements of *chapter 39.29 RCW. The director also may enter into supervisory agreements with other appropriate bank supervisory agencies and the bank to prescribe the applicable laws governing powers and authorities, including but not limited to corporate governance and operational matters, of Washington branches of an out-of-state bank chartered by another state or out-of-state branches of a Washington state bank. The supervisory agreement may resolve conflict of laws among home and host states and specify the manner in which the examination, supervision, and application processes shall be coordinated among the home and host states.

(4) The director may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any branch in Washington of an out-of-state state bank or any branch of a Washington state bank in any host state. The director also may at any time take action independently if the director deems it necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state. However, in the case of an out-of-state state bank, the director shall recognize the exclusive authority of the home state regulator over corporate governance and operational matters and the primary responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to safety and soundness matters, unless otherwise specified in the supervisory agreement executed pursuant to this section.

(5) Each out-of-state state bank that maintains one or more branches in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of the director. The director is authorized to enter into agreements to share fees with other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies.

[ 1996 c 2 s 14. Formerly RCW 30.38.040.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013. See chapter 39.26 RCW.